Hawaii statutes.
[§425R-10] Resignation of registered agent.
(a) A registered agent may resign at any time with respect to a represented
entity by filing with the director a certified statement of resignation signed
by or on behalf of the agent that states:

(1) The name of the entity;

(2) The name of the agent;

(3) That the agent resigns from serving as agent for
service of process for the entity; and

(4) The name and address of the person to which the
agent will send the notice required by subsection (c).

(b) A statement of resignation takes effect on
the earlier of the thirty-first day after the day on which it is filed or the
appointment of a new registered agent for the represented entity.

(c) The registered agent shall promptly
furnish the represented entity notice in a record of the date on which a
statement of resignation was filed.

(d) When a statement of resignation takes
effect, the registered agent ceases to have responsibility for any matter
tendered to it as agent for the represented entity. A resignation under this
section does not affect any contractual rights the entity has against the agent
or that the agent has against the entity.

(e) A registered agent may resign with respect
to a represented entity whether or not the entity is in good standing. [L 2009,
c 55, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next